South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3554.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-13-1314 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-13-1314. (A) Within an election cycle, a candidate or anyone acting on his behalf shall not solicit or accept, and a person shall not give or offer to give to a candidate or person acting on the candidate's behalf: (1) a contribution which exceeds: (a) three thousand five hundred seven thousand dollars in the case of a candidate for statewide office; or (b) three thousand five hundred seven thousand dollars in the aggregate for statewide candidates elected jointly pursuant to Section 8, Article IV of the South Carolina Constitution, 1895; or (c) one two thousand dollars in the case of a candidate for any other office; (2) a cash contribution from an individual unless the cash contribution does not exceed twenty-five dollars and is accompanied by a record of the amount of the contribution and the name and address of the contributor; (3) a contribution from, whether directly or indirectly, a registered lobbyist if that lobbyist engages in lobbying the public office or public body for which the candidate is seeking election; (4) contributions for two elective offices simultaneously, except as provided in Section 8-13-1318. (B) The restrictions on contributions in subsection (A)(1) and (2) do not apply to a candidate making a contribution to his own campaign. SECTION 2.  Section 8-13-1316 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-13-1316. (A) Notwithstanding Section 8-13-1314(A)(1), within an election cycle, a candidate may not accept or receive contributions from a political party through its party committees or legislative caucus committees, and a political party through its party committees or legislative caucus committees may not give to a candidate contributions which total in the aggregate more than: (1) fifty thousand dollars in the case of a candidate for statewide office; or (2) five ten thousand dollars in the case of a candidate for any other office. (B) The recipient of a contribution given in violation of subsection (A) may not keep the contribution, but within seven days must remit the contribution to the Children's Trust Fund. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----